North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 11. Nomination by Petition.

§ 163-122.
Unaffiliated candidates nominated by petition.

Procedure for Having Name Printed on Ballot as Unaffiliated Candidate. — Any qualified voter who seeks to have the voter’s name printed on the general election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate shall:

If the office is a statewide office, file written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting the voter’s candidacy for a specified office. These petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of
the primary election and must be signed by qualified voters of the State equal in number to one and a half percent (1.5%) of the total number of voters who voted in the most recent general election for Governor. Also, the
petition must be signed by at least 200 registered voters from each of three congressional districts in North Carolina. The petitions shall be divided into sections based on the county in which the signatures were obtained.
Provided the petitions are timely filed, the State Board of Elections shall require the filed petition be verified no later than 15 business days after canvass of the primary in one of the following ways:

The Executive Director shall examine the names on the petition and place a check mark on the petition by the name of each signer who is qualified and registered to vote in the designated county and shall attach to the petition a signed certificate. Said
certificates shall state that the signatures on the petition have been checked against the registration records and shall indicate the number of signers to be qualified and registered to vote in each county.

The chair shall examine the names on the petition and place a check mark on the petition by the name of each signer who is qualified and registered to vote in the chair’s county and shall attach to the petition the chair’s signed certificate. Said certificates
shall state that the signatures on the petition have been checked against the registration records and shall indicate the number of signers to be qualified and registered to vote in the chair’s county. The chair
shall return the petition and certificate to the State Board. The State Board shall return a copy of each petition, together with a copy of the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it
to the State Board.

Except as provided in this subsection, if the office is a district office under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections under G.S. 163-182.4(b), file written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting that voter’s candidacy for a
specified office. For district offices other than General Assembly seats, petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary election and must be signed by qualified
voters of the district equal in number to one and a half percent (1.5%) of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected by the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January
1 of the year in which the general election is to be held. For General Assembly seats in which the district lies in more than one county, petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon
on the day of the primary election and must be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to four percent (4%) of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected by the voter registration
records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held. The petitions shall be divided into sections based on the county in which the signatures were obtained. The
petitions shall be verified as specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

If the office is a county office or a single county legislative district, file written petitions with the chair or director of the county board of elections supporting the voter’s candidacy for a specified county office. These petitions must be filed
with the county board of elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary election and must be signed by qualified voters of the county equal in number to four percent (4%) of the total number of registered voters
in the county as reflected by the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held, except if the office is for a district consisting of
less than the entire county and only the voters in that district vote for that office, the petitions must be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to four percent (4%) of the total number of voters
in the district according to the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held. Each petition shall be presented to the chair or director
of the county board of elections. The chair or director of the county board of elections shall verify the filed petition no later than 15 business days after canvass as provided in sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1)
of this subsection, and shall return a copy of each petition, together with a copy of the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it to the county board of elections.

If the office is a partisan municipal office, file written petitions with the chair or director of the county board of elections in the county wherein the municipality is located supporting the voter’s candidacy for a specified municipal office. These
petitions must be filed with the county board of elections on or before the time and date specified in

G.S. 163-296

and must be signed by the number of qualified voters specified in

G.S. 163-296

. The chair or director of the county board of elections shall verify the filed petition no later than 15 business days after canvass as provided in sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
and shall return a copy of each petition, together with a copy of the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it to the county board of elections.

If the office is a superior court judge or a district court judge, regardless of whether the district lies entirely in one county or in more than one county, file written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting that voter’s candidacy for
a specified office. These petitions must be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before 12:00 noon on the day of the primary election and must be signed by qualified voters of the district equal in number to two
percent (2%) of the total number of registered voters in the district as reflected by the voter registration records of the State Board of Elections as of January 1 of the year in which the general election is to be held.
The petitions shall be divided into sections based on the county in which the signatures were obtained. The petitions shall be verified as specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection.Upon compliance with the provisions
of subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this subsection, the board of elections with which the petitions have been timely filed shall cause the unaffiliated candidate’s name to be printed on the general election ballots
in accordance with Article 14A of this Chapter.

An individual whose name appeared on the ballot in a primary election preliminary to the general election shall not be eligible to have that individual’s name placed on the general election ballot as an unaffiliated candidate for the same office in that
year.

Form of Petition. — Petitions requesting an unaffiliated candidate to be placed on the general election ballot shall contain on the heading of each page of the petition in bold print or in all capital letters the words: “THE UNDERSIGNED REGISTERED VOTERS
IN _______________ COUNTY HEREBY PETITION ON BEHALF OF _______________ AS AN UNAFFILIATED CANDIDATE FOR THE OFFICE OF _______________ IN THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION. THE UNDERSIGNED HEREBY PETITION THAT SUBJECT CANDIDATE BE
PLACED ON THE APPROPRIATE BALLOT UPON COMPLIANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS CONTAINED IN

G.S. 163-122

.”

When any person files a petition with a board of elections under this section, the board of elections shall, immediately upon receipt of the petition, inspect the registration records of the county and cancel the petition of any person who does not meet
the constitutional or statutory qualifications for the office, including residency.The board shall give notice of cancellation to any person whose petition has been cancelled under this subsection by mail or by having the notice
served on that person by the sheriff and to any other candidate filing for the same office. A person whose petition has been cancelled or another candidate for the same office affected by a substantiation under this subsection
may request a hearing on the issue of constitutional or statutory qualifications for the office. If the person requests a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Article 11B of this Chapter.

Any candidate seeking to have that candidate’s name printed on the general election ballot under this section shall pay a filing fee equal to that provided for candidates for the office in

G.S. 163-107

or comply with the alternative available to candidates for the office in

G.S. 163-107

.1.

History.
1929, c. 164, s. 6; 1931, c. 223; 1935, c. 236; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, s. 50; 1977, c. 408, s. 3; 1979, c. 23, ss. 1, 3; c. 534, s. 2; 1981, c. 637; 1991, c. 297, s. 1; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess.,
c. 9, s. 14; 1999-424, s. 5(b); 2002-159, s. 21(b); 2004-127, s. 8(a); 2006-155, s. 3; 2006-234, ss. 4, 5; 2007-391, s. 8(a); 2007-484, s. 21; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-3, s. 10; 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-214, s. 2(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a),
(b).

Local Modification.

Avery: 1997-99; city of Lincolnton: 2017-62, ss. 1, 2; city of Winston-Salem: 2017-72, s. 1; Anson County Board of Commissioners: 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 781, s. 6 (but shall only be enforced as provided by Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965).

§ 163-123.
Declaration of intent and petitions for write-in candidates in partisan elections.

Procedure for Qualifying as a Write-In Candidate. — Any qualified voter who seeks to have write-in votes for him counted in a general election shall file a declaration of intent in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and petition(s) in accordance
with subsection (c) of this section.

Declaration of Intent. — The applicant for write-in candidacy shall file his declaration of intent at the same time and with the same board of elections as his petition, as set out in subsection (c) of this section. The declaration shall contain:

Applicant’s name,

Applicant’s residential address,

Declaration of applicant’s intent to be a write-in candidate,

Title of the office sought,

Date of the election,

Date of the declaration,

Applicant’s signature.

Petitions for Write-in Candidacy. — An applicant for write-in candidacy shall:

If the office is a statewide office, file written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting his candidacy for a specified office. These petitions shall be filed on or before noon on the 90th day before the general election. They shall be
signed by 500 qualified voters of the State. No later than 5:00 p.m. on the fifteenth day preceding the date the petitions are due to be filed with the State Board of Elections, each petition shall be presented to the board
of elections of the county in which the signatures were obtained. A petition presented to a county board of elections shall contain only names of voters registered in that county. Provided the petitions are timely submitted,
the chairman of the county board of elections shall examine the names on the petition and place a check mark by the name of each signer who is qualified and registered to vote in his county. The chairman of the county board
shall attach to the petition his signed certificate. On his certificate the chairman shall state that the signatures on the petition have been checked against the registration records and shall indicate the number of signers
who are qualified and registered to vote in his county and eligible to vote for that office. The chairman shall return each petition, together with the certificate required in this section, to the person who presented it
to him for checking. The chairman of the county board shall complete the verification within two weeks from the date the petition is presented.

If the office is a district office under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections under G.S. 163-182.4(b), file written petitions with the State Board of Elections supporting that applicant’s candidacy for a specified office. These petitions must
be filed with the State Board of Elections on or before noon on the 90th day before the general election and must be signed by 250 qualified voters. Before being filed with the State Board of Elections, each petition shall
be presented to the board of elections of the county in which the signatures were obtained. A petition presented to a county board of elections shall contain only names of voters registered in that county who are eligible
to vote for that office. The chairman of the county board shall examine the names on the petition and the procedure for certification shall be the same as specified in subdivision (1).

If the office is a county office, or is a school administrative unit office elected on a partisan basis, or is a legislative district consisting of a single county or a portion of a county, file written petitions with the county board of elections supporting
his candidacy for a specified office. A petition presented to a county board of elections shall contain only names of voters registered in that county. These petitions must be filed on or before noon on the 90th day before
the general election and must be signed by 100 qualified voters who are eligible to vote for the office, unless fewer than 5,000 persons are eligible to vote for the office as shown by the most recent records of the appropriate
board of elections. If fewer than 5,000 persons are eligible to vote for the office, an applicant’s petition must be signed by not less than one percent (1%) of those registered voters. Before being filed with the county
board of elections, each petition shall be presented to the county board of elections for examination. The chairman of the county board of elections shall examine the names on the petition and the procedure for certification
shall be the same as specified in subdivision (1).

Form of Petition.— Petitions requesting the qualification of a write-in candidate in a general election shall contain on the heading of each page of the candidate in a general election shall contain on the heading of each page of the petition in bold
print or in capital letters the words: ‘‘THE UNDERSIGNED REGISTERED VOTERS IN COUNTY HEREBY PETI TION ON BEHALF OF AS A WRITE-IN CANDIDATE IN THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION. THE UN- DERSIGNED HEREBY PETITION THAT SUBJECT CANDIDATE BE
PLACED ON THE LIST OF QUALIFIED WRITE-IN CANDIDATES WHOSE VOTES ARE TO BE COUNTED AND RECORDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH

G.S. 163-123

Click to view

Defeated Primary Candidate. — No person whose name appeared on the ballot in a primary election preliminary to the general election shall be eligible to have votes counted for him as a write-in candidate for the same office in that year.

Counting and Recording of Votes. — If a qualified voter has complied with the provisions of subsections (a), (b), and (c) and is not excluded by subsection (e), the board of elections with which petition has been filed shall count votes for him according
to the procedures set out in

G.S. 163-182.1

, and the appropriate board of elections shall record those votes on the official abstract. Write-in votes for names other than those of qualified write-in candidates shall not be counted for any purpose and shall
not be recorded on the abstract.

When any person files a petition with a board of elections under this section, the board of elections shall, immediately upon receipt of the petition, inspect the registration records of the county and cancel the petition of any person who does not meet
the constitutional or statutory qualifications for the office, including residency.The board shall give notice of cancellation to any person whose petition has been cancelled under this subsection by mail or by having the notice
served on that person by the sheriff. A person whose petition has been cancelled or another candidate for the same office affected by a substantiation under this subsection may request a hearing on the issue of constitutional or
statutory qualifications for the office. If the person requests a hearing, the hearing shall be conducted in accordance with Article 11B of this Chapter.

Municipal Elections Excluded. — This section does not apply to municipal elections conducted under Subchapter IX of this Chapter.

History.
1987, c. 393, ss. 1; 2; 1989, c. 92, s. 1; 1999-424, s. 5(c); 2001-319, s. 9(a); 2001-398, s. 7; 2001-403, s. 12; 2002-158, s. 13; 2004-127, s. 7; 2006-155, s. 4; 2007-391, s. 8(b); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-3, s. 11; 2017-6,
s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-124.
No run for two separate offices at the same time.

No individual is eligible to have that individual’s name on the general election ballot for two separate offices, unless one of the offices is for the remainder of the unexpired term for an office that requires an election to fill the unexpired portion
of the term.

This section shall apply to any individual nominated under Article 9 of this Chapter, filing under

G.S. 163-106

, 163-106.1, 163-106.2, 163-106.3, 163-106.4, 163-106.5, and 163-106.6, or filing a petition under this Article.

History.
2011-214, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).